Maine, session 132, LD991.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §611 is enacted to read:
§611. Guidance to municipal clerks
The Secretary of State shall produce and publicly disseminate guidance to municipal
clerks for implementing the provisions of Title 30-A, section 2524, subsection 1-A; section
2528, subsection 5, paragraph D; and section 2554, subsection 4. The guidance must
provide instructions for:
1. Disqualified voters. Identifying municipal voters who are disqualified from voting
on specific articles or referendum questions or city referendum questions pursuant to Title
30-A, section 2524, subsection 1-A; section 2528, subsection 5, paragraph D; and section
2554, subsection 4; and
2. Prohibition on voting. Ensuring that a municipal voter identified in accordance with
paragraph A is not permitted to vote during a town meeting on an article or referendum
question that the voter is disqualified from voting on pursuant to Title 30-A, section 2524,
subsection 1-A; section 2528, subsection 5, paragraph D; and section 2554, subsection 4
and is not given a ballot containing an article or referendum question that the voter is
disqualified from voting on pursuant to Title 30-A, section 2524, subsection 1-A; section
2528, subsection 5, paragraph D; and section 2554, subsection 4.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §2501, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 104, Pt. C, §10 and
Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
2. Qualifications for voting. The Except as provided in section 2524, subsection 1-A;
section 2528, subsection 5, paragraph D; and section 2554, subsection 4, qualifications for
voting in a municipal election conducted under this Title are governed solely by Title 21‑A,
section 111.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §2524, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
1. Qualified voter; election of town officials. Every Except as provided in subsection
1-A, every voter in the town may vote in the election of all town officials and in all town
affairs.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §2524, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Disqualification based on direct pecuniary interest. A voter who has a direct
pecuniary interest in an article or referendum question may not vote on that article or
referendum question at the town meeting or by secret ballot pursuant to section 2528. For
purposes of this subsection, a voter has a direct pecuniary interest in an article or a
referendum question that involves approving or ratifying or denying approval or ratification
of a contract or a budget, including the school budget, directly affecting the compensation
of the voter, including a budget that appropriates or deappropriates money in a way that
changes the salary, hourly rate of compensation or employment benefits of the voter.
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §2528, sub-§5, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. The provisions of section 2524, subsection 1-A apply to any referendum question
voted on by secret ballot.
Page 1 - 132LR0801(01)

Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §2554, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Voter disqualification based on pecuniary interest. A voter who has a direct
pecuniary interest in an city referendum question may not vote on that referendum question.
For purposes of this subsection, a voter has a direct pecuniary interest in a referendum
question that involves approving or ratifying or denying approval or ratification of a
contract or a budget, including the school budget, directly affecting the compensation of
the voter, including a budget that appropriates or deappropriates money in a way that
changes the salary, hourly rate of compensation or employment benefits of the voter.